District of Columbia statutes.
10-307

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within the 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

(1)

Within 180 days of April 23, 2013, the Mayor shall issue rules, which shall:

(A)

Ensure maximum permissible use of Department areas and facilities by appropriate distribution of users, with special attention to the balance of uses between Department programs, community uses, and fee-based uses;

(B)

Ensure equitable access to fee-based uses through provisions for modest, reduced, or waived fees;

(C)

Ensure proper, orderly, and equitable use through scheduling;

(D)

Ensure protection and preservation of areas and facilities by not overtaxing facilities;

(E)

Promote the health, safety, and welfare of users;

(F)

Establish clear procedures for obtaining permits and revocation of permits; and

(G)

Update the entire Department fee and permit schedules, maintaining a lower cost for residents.

(2)

The authority granted to the Department in § 10-302(b-1) and (d) and § 10-302.01 shall not be exercised until the rules required by paragraph (1) of this subsection have been adopted.

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 7a
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 6042(d), 58 DCR 6226
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-280, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2124
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-216, § 2, 61 DCR 13104
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Department of Parks and Recreation Fee-based Use Permit Authority Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-5, Feb. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 2472, 21 STAT 804).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Department of Parks and Recreation Fee-based Use Permit Authority Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-353, June 17, 2014, 61 DCR 6334).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Department of Parks and Recreation Fee-based Use Permit Authority Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-299, March 14, 2014, 61 DCR 2570, 20 DCSTAT 3068).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Department of Parks and Recreation Feebased Use Permit Authority Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-113, June 21, 2014, 61 DCR 4332).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-216 substituted “§ 10-302(b-1) and (d) and § 10-302.01” for “§ 10-302(b-1) and (d), § 10-302.01, and § 10-302.02” in (b)(2).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-280 redesignated the existing paragraph as (a); and added (b).